Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2250.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-6208 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 65-6208. (a) Subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 65-6209, and
amendments thereto, an annual assessment on services is imposed on each
hospital provider in an amount not less than 1.83% of each hospital's net
inpatient operating revenue and not greater than 3% 6% of each hospital's
net inpatient and outpatient operating revenue, as determined by the
healthcare access improvement panel in consultation with the department
of health and environment, for the hospital's fiscal year three years prior to
the assessment year. In the event that a hospital does not have a complete
12-month fiscal year in such third prior fiscal year, the assessment under
this section shall be $200,000 until such date that such hospital has
completed the hospital's first 12-month fiscal year. Upon completing such
first 12-month fiscal year, such hospital's assessment under this section
shall be the amount not less than 1.83% of each hospital's net inpatient
operating revenue and not greater than 3% 6% of such hospital's net
inpatient and outpatient operating revenue, as determined by the healthcare
access improvement panel in consultation with the department of health
and environment, for such first completed 12-month fiscal year.
(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize any home rule
unit or other unit of local government to license for revenue or impose a
tax or assessment upon hospital providers or a tax or assessment measured
by the income or earnings of a hospital provider.
(c) (1) The department of health and environment shall submit to the
United States centers for medicare and medicaid services any approval
request necessary to implement the amendments made to subsection (a) by
section 1 of chapter 7 of the 2020 Session Laws of Kansas and this act. If
the department has submitted such a request pursuant to section 80(l) of

HB 2250 2
chapter 68 of the 2019 Session Laws of Kansas or section 1 of chapter 7 of
the 2020 Session Laws of Kansas, then the department may continue such
request, or modify such request to conform to the amendments made to
subsection (a) by section 1 of chapter 7 of the 2020 Session Laws of
Kansas and this act, to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph.
(2) The secretary of health and environment shall certify to the
secretary of state the receipt of such approval and cause notice of such
approval to be published in the Kansas register.
(3) The amendments made to subsection (a) by section 1 of chapter 7
of the 2020 Session Laws of Kansas and this act shall take effect on and
after January 1 or July 1 immediately following such publication of such
approval.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-6209 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 65-6209. (a) A hospital provider that is a state agency, the
authority, as defined in K.S.A. 76-3304, and amendments thereto, a state
educational institution, as defined in K.S.A. 76-711, and amendments
thereto, a critical access hospital, as defined in K.S.A. 65-468, and
amendments thereto, with revenues below the threshold determined by the
healthcare access improvement panel, or a rural emergency hospital
licensed under the rural emergency hospital act, K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-481
et seq., and amendments thereto, with revenues below the threshold
determined by the healthcare access improvement panel, is exempt from
the assessment imposed by K.S.A. 65-6208, and amendments thereto.
(b) A hospital operated by the department in the course of performing
its mental health or developmental disabilities functions is exempt from
the assessment imposed by K.S.A. 65-6208, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 65-6210 is hereby amended to read as follows: 65-
6210. (a) The assessment imposed by K.S.A. 65-6208, and amendments
thereto, for any state fiscal year to which this statute applies shall be due
and payable in equal installments on or before June May 30 and December
31 November 30, commencing with whichever date first occurs after the
hospital has received payments for 150 days after the effective date of the
payment methodology approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid
services. No installment payment of an assessment under this act shall be
due and payable, however, until after:
(1) The hospital provider receives written notice from the department
that the payment methodologies to hospitals required under this act have
been approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services of the
United States department of health and human services under 42 C.F.R. §
433.68 for the assessment imposed by K.S.A. 65-6208, and amendments
thereto, has been granted by the centers for medicare and medicaid
services of the United States department of health and human services; and
(2) in the case of a hospital provider, the hospital has received

HB 2250 3
payments for 150 days after the effective date of the payment methodology
approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.
(b) The department is authorized to establish delayed payment
schedules for hospital providers that are unable to make installment
payments when due under this section due to financial difficulties, as
determined by the department.
(c) If a hospital provider fails to pay the full amount of an installment
when due, including any extensions granted under this section, there shall
be added to the assessment imposed by K.S.A. 65-6208, and amendments
thereto, unless waived by the department for reasonable cause, a penalty
assessment equal to the lesser of:
(1) An amount equal to 5% of the installment amount not paid on or
before the due date plus 5% of the portion thereof remaining unpaid on the
last day of each month thereafter; or
(2) an amount equal to 100% of the installment amount not paid on or
before the due date.
For purposes of this subsection (c), payments will shall be credited first
to unpaid installment amounts, rather than to penalty or interest amounts,
beginning with the most delinquent installment.
(d) The department is authorized to take legal action against any
hospital that fails to pay the amount due, including penalties, upon
recommendation of the healthcare access improvement program panel,
unless such hospital has established and is compliant with a payment
schedule approved by the department.
(e) The effective date for the payment methodology applicable to
hospital providers approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid
services shall be the date of July 1 or January 1, whichever date is
designated in the state plan submitted by the department of health and
environment for approval by the centers for medicare and medicaid
services.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 65-6210 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-6208 and 65-6209
are hereby repealed.
Sec. 5. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.